Washington statutes.
RCW 43.270.020

Grant program—Application—Activities funded.

(1) There is established in the department of commerce a grant program to provide incentive for and support for communities to develop targeted and coordinated strategies to reduce the incidence and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence.

(2) The department of commerce shall make awards, subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, under the following terms:

(a) Starting July 1, 2001, funds will be available to countywide programs through a formula developed by the department of commerce in consultation with program contractors, which will take into consideration county population size.

(b) In order to be eligible for consideration, applicants must demonstrate, at a minimum:

(i) That the community has developed and is committed to carrying out a coordinated strategy of prevention, treatment, and law enforcement activities;

(ii) That the community has considered research-based theory when developing its strategy;

(iii) That proposals submitted for funding are based on a local assessment of need and address specific objectives contained in a coordinated strategy of prevention, treatment, and law enforcement against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence;

(iv) Evidence of active participation in preparation of the proposal and specific commitments to implementing the community-wide agenda by leadership from education, law enforcement, local government, tribal government, and treatment entities in the community, and the opportunity for meaningful involvement from others such as neighborhood and citizen groups, businesses, human service, health and job training organizations, and other key elements of the community, particularly those whose responsibilities in law enforcement, treatment, prevention, education, or other community efforts provide direct, ongoing contact with substance abusers or those who exhibit violent behavior, or those at risk for alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(v) Evidence of additional local resources committed to the applicant's strategy totaling at least twenty-five percent of funds awarded under this section. These resources may consist of public or private funds, donated goods or services, and other measurable commitments, including in-kind contributions such as volunteer services, materials, supplies, physical facilities, or a combination thereof; and

(vi) That the funds applied for, if received, will not be used to replace funding for existing activities.

(c) At a minimum, grant applications must include the following:

(i) A definition of geographic area;

(ii) A needs assessment describing the extent and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, and violence in the community, including an explanation of those who are most severely impacted and those most at risk of substance abuse or violent behavior;

(iii) An explanation of the community-wide strategy for prevention, treatment, and law enforcement activities related to alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence, with particular attention to those who are most severely impacted and/or those most at risk of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(iv) An explanation of who was involved in development of the strategy and what specific commitments have been made to carry it out;

(v) Identification of existing prevention, education, treatment, and law enforcement resources committed by the applicant, including financial and other support, and an explanation of how the applicant's strategy involves and builds on the efforts of existing organizations or coalitions that have been carrying out community efforts against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence;

(vi) Identification of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which additional resources are needed;

(vii) Identification of additional local resources, including public or private funds, donated goods or services, and other measurable commitments, that have been committed to the activities identified in (c)(vi) of this subsection;

(viii) Identification of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which funding is requested;

(ix) For each activity for which funding is requested, an explanation in sufficient detail to demonstrate:

(A) Feasibility through deliberative design, specific objectives, and a realistic plan for implementation;

(B) A rationale for how this activity will achieve measurable results and how it will be evaluated;

(C) That funds requested are necessary and appropriate to effectively carry out the activity; and

(x) Identification of a contracting agent meeting state requirements for each activity proposed for funding.

Each contracting agent must execute a written agreement with its local community mobilization advisory board that reflects the duties and powers of each party.

(3) Activities that may be funded through this grant program include those that:

(a) Prevent alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence through educational efforts, development of positive alternatives, intervention with high-risk groups, and other prevention strategies;

(b) Support effective treatment by increasing access to and availability of treatment opportunities, particularly for underserved or highly impacted populations, developing aftercare and support mechanisms, and other strategies to increase the availability and effectiveness of treatment;

(c) Provide meaningful consequences for participation in illegal activity and promote safe and healthy communities through support of law enforcement strategies;

(d) Create or build on efforts by existing community programs, coordinate their efforts, and develop cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make most effective use of resources to carry out the community's strategy against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence; and

(e) Other activities that demonstrate both feasibility and a rationale for how the activity will achieve measurable results in the strategy against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2075; 2001 c 48 s 2; 1989 c 271 s 316.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.